District of Columbia statutes.
28:3-410

Acceptance varying draft.

(a)

If the terms of a drawee’s acceptance vary from the terms of the draft as presented, the holder may refuse the acceptance and treat the draft as dishonored. In that case, the drawee may cancel the acceptance.

(b)

The terms of a draft are not varied by an acceptance to pay at a particular bank or place in the United States, unless the acceptance states that the draft is to be paid only at that bank or place.

(c)

If the holder assents to an acceptance varying the terms of a draft, the obligation of each drawer and endorser that does not expressly assent to the acceptance is discharged.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 684, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-249, § 2(d), 42 DCR 467
1973 Ed., § 28:3-412.
1981 Ed., § 28:3-410.

Section 3-501(b)(1) states that if an instrument is payable at a bank in the United States presentment must be made at the place of payment ( Section 3-111) which in this case is at the designated bank.

2. Under subsection (b) an acceptance does not vary from the terms of the draft if it provides for payment at any particular bank or place in the United States unless the acceptance states that the draft is to be paid only at such bank or place.

If the holder assents to the varied acceptance, the drawee’s obligation as acceptor is according to the terms of the varied acceptance. Under subsection (c) the effect of the holder’s assent is to discharge any drawer or indorser who does not also assent. The assent of the drawer or indorser must be affirmatively expressed. Mere failure to object within a reasonable time is not assent which will prevent the discharge.

1. This section is a restatement of former Section 3-412. It applies to conditional acceptances, acceptances for part of the amount, acceptances to pay at a different time from that required by the draft, or to the acceptance of less than all of the drawees. It applies to any other engagement changing the essential terms of the draft. If the drawee makes a varied acceptance the holder may either reject it or assent to it. The holder may reject by insisting on acceptance of the draft as presented. Refusal by the drawee to accept the draft as presented is dishonor. In that event the drawee is not bound by the varied acceptance and is entitled to have it canceled.